Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2579.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; AGRI WORKS AND AGRI SUPPORT.new text end new text begin (a) $490,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $490,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of agriculture to award grants under the AGRI works program. Agriculture-related institutions and nonprofits may apply for grants up to $20,000. Grantees must submit their most recent tax documents and complete an application in the form and manner prescribed by the commissioner to be eligible for grants under this appropriation. These are onetime appropriations. new text end new text begin (b) $490,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $490,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of agriculture to award grants under the AGRI support program. Agriculture-related institutions and nonprofits may apply for grants over $20,000 but not more than $200,000. Grantees must submit their most recent tax documents and complete an application in the form and manner prescribed by the commissioner to be eligible for grants under this appropriation. These are onetime appropriations. new text end